Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-168
Acceptance of cession or retrocession of federal jurisdiction; filing.

By appropriate executive order, the Governor may accept on behalf of the state full or partial cession or retrocession of federal jurisdiction, criminal or civil, over any lands, except Indian lands, in federal enclaves within the state where such cession or retrocession has been offered by appropriate federal authority. An executive order accepting a cession or retrocession of jurisdiction shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State and in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the affected real estate is located.

Laws 1993, LB 545, § 1.